Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.033

Amendment—Technical advisory groups.

(1) The state building code council may appoint technical advisory groups to review petitions for statewide amendments as authorized in this chapter and chapter 19.27A RCW.

(a) A technical advisory group may include one voting councilmember.

(b) A technical advisory group must consist of subject matter experts as designated by the council. A subject matter expert is defined as an individual who by education, training, or experience is a recognized expert on a particular subject, topic, or system.

(c) A technical advisory group member may be removed by the state building code council if the member no longer meets the qualifications necessary to fill the position.

(d) Three consecutive absences of a technical advisory group member from meetings of the technical advisory group are grounds for the state building code council to designate the member's status as ex officio, until a reappointment is made. Ex officio members are not considered when determining a quorum.

(e) Within three months of appointment, technical advisory group members must receive training on ethics in public service including, but not limited to, provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW.

(f) Technical advisory group members and the industry or stakeholder groups they are representing must be posted on the council website.

(2) Any person who wishes to be appointed to serve on a technical advisory group must submit an application that satisfies the requirements for an application set by the council. Any application for such appointment must be approved or denied within 30 days after the closing of the application submittal period.

(3) A petition for an amendment referred to a technical advisory group must be approved by a majority of the technical advisory group voting members to be taken up for consideration by the state building code council.

[ 2024 c 170 s 7.]